sn_ZW/sn_ZW.aff
#
#
PFX A  Y 66182 
PFX A 0 /CDF . 
PFX A 0 a/CDF . 
PFX A 0 a/D . 
PFX A 0 a/G . 
PFX A 0 aa/D . 
PFX A 0 aa/G . 
PFX A 0 aaa/G . 
PFX A 0 aachi/G . 
PFX A 0 aadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 aahu/G . 
PFX A 0 aahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 aai/G . 
PFX A 0 aaiku/G . 
PFX A 0 aaisi/G . 
PFX A 0 aaka/G . 
PFX A 0 aakaa/G . 
PFX A 0 aakachi/G . 
PFX A 0 aakadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 aakahu/G . 
PFX A 0 aakahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 aakai/G . 
PFX A 0 aakaka/G . 
PFX A 0 aakaku/G . 
PFX A 0 aakamu/G . 
PFX A 0 aakandi/G . 
PFX A 0 aakapa/G . 
PFX A 0 aakari/G . 
PFX A 0 aakaru/G . 
PFX A 0 aakarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 aakati/G . 
PFX A 0 aakatu/G . 
PFX A 0 aakatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 aakau/G . 
PFX A 0 aakava/G . 
PFX A 0 aakawa/G . 
PFX A 0 aakazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 aaku/G . 
PFX A 0 aamu/G . 
PFX A 0 aandi/G . 
PFX A 0 aano/G . 
PFX A 0 aanoku/F . 
PFX A 0 aanoku/G . 
PFX A 0 aanosi/G . 
PFX A 0 aapa/G . 
PFX A 0 aari/G . 
PFX A 0 aaru/G . 
PFX A 0 aarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 aati/G . 
PFX A 0 aatu/G . 
PFX A 0 aatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 aau/G . 
PFX A 0 aava/G . 
PFX A 0 aawa/G . 
PFX A 0 aazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 acha/D . 
PFX A 0 acha/F . 
PFX A 0 acha/G . 
PFX A 0 achaa/D . 
PFX A 0 achaa/G . 
PFX A 0 achachi/D . 
PFX A 0 achachi/G . 
PFX A 0 achado/D . 
PFX A 0 achadzi/D . 
PFX A 0 achadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 achafano/D . 
PFX A 0 achafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 achagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 achago/D . 
PFX A 0 achahu/D . 
PFX A 0 achahu/G . 
PFX A 0 achahwu/D . 
PFX A 0 achahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 achai/D . 
PFX A 0 achai/G . 
PFX A 0 achaiku/G . 
PFX A 0 achaisi/G . 
PFX A 0 achaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 achaka/D . 
PFX A 0 achaka/G . 
PFX A 0 achakaa/G . 
PFX A 0 achakachi/G . 
PFX A 0 achakadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 achakahu/G . 
PFX A 0 achakahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 achakai/G . 
PFX A 0 achakaka/G . 
PFX A 0 achakaku/G . 
PFX A 0 achakamu/G . 
PFX A 0 achakandi/G . 
PFX A 0 achakapa/G . 
PFX A 0 achakari/G . 
PFX A 0 achakaru/G . 
PFX A 0 achakarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 achakati/G . 
PFX A 0 achakatu/G . 
PFX A 0 achakatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 achakau/G . 
PFX A 0 achakava/G . 
PFX A 0 achakawa/G . 
PFX A 0 achakazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 achaku/D . 
PFX A 0 achaku/G . 
PFX A 0 achambo/D . 
PFX A 0 achamu/D . 
PFX A 0 achamu/G . 
PFX A 0 achandi/D . 
PFX A 0 achandi/G . 
PFX A 0 achando/D . 
PFX A 0 achango/D . 
PFX A 0 achanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 achano/D . 
PFX A 0 achanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 achanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 achapa/D . 
PFX A 0 achapa/G . 
PFX A 0 achari/D . 
PFX A 0 achari/G . 
PFX A 0 acharu/D . 
PFX A 0 acharu/G . 
PFX A 0 acharwu/D . 
PFX A 0 acharwu/G . 
PFX A 0 achasi/D . 
PFX A 0 achasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 achasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 achaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 achati/D . 
PFX A 0 achati/G . 
PFX A 0 achato/D . 
PFX A 0 achatu/D . 
PFX A 0 achatu/G . 
PFX A 0 achatwu/D . 
PFX A 0 achatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 achau/D . 
PFX A 0 achau/G . 
PFX A 0 achava/D . 
PFX A 0 achava/G . 
PFX A 0 achawa/D . 
PFX A 0 achawa/G . 
PFX A 0 achawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 achazai/D . 
PFX A 0 achazo/D . 
PFX A 0 achazvi/D . 
PFX A 0 achazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 achi/D . 
PFX A 0 achi/G . 
PFX A 0 achido/D . 
PFX A 0 achifano/D . 
PFX A 0 achifumo/D . 
PFX A 0 achigaro/D . 
PFX A 0 achigo/D . 
PFX A 0 achiisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 achimbo/D . 
PFX A 0 achindo/D . 
PFX A 0 achingo/D . 
PFX A 0 achinguno/D . 
PFX A 0 achino/D . 
PFX A 0 achino/G . 
PFX A 0 achinoku/F . 
PFX A 0 achinoku/G . 
PFX A 0 achinosi/G . 
PFX A 0 achinyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 achinyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 achisi/D . 
PFX A 0 achisvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 achisviko/D . 
PFX A 0 achiswero/D . 
PFX A 0 achito/D . 
PFX A 0 achiwanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 achizai/D . 
PFX A 0 achizo/D . 
PFX A 0 ado/D . 
PFX A 0 ado/G . 
PFX A 0 adza/G . 
PFX A 0 adzaa/G . 
PFX A 0 adzachi/G . 
PFX A 0 adzadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 adzahu/G . 
PFX A 0 adzahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 adzai/G . 
PFX A 0 adzaiku/G . 
PFX A 0 adzaisi/G . 
PFX A 0 adzaka/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakaa/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakachi/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakahu/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakai/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakaka/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakaku/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakamu/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakandi/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakapa/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakari/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakaru/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakati/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakatu/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakau/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakava/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakawa/G . 
PFX A 0 adzakazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 adzaku/G . 
PFX A 0 adzamu/G . 
PFX A 0 adzandi/G . 
PFX A 0 adzapa/G . 
PFX A 0 adzari/G . 
PFX A 0 adzaru/G . 
PFX A 0 adzarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 adzati/G . 
PFX A 0 adzatu/G . 
PFX A 0 adzatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 adzau/G . 
PFX A 0 adzava/G . 
PFX A 0 adzawa/G . 
PFX A 0 adzazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 adzi/D . 
PFX A 0 adzino/G . 
PFX A 0 adzinoku/F . 
PFX A 0 adzinoku/G . 
PFX A 0 adzinosi/G . 
PFX A 0 afano/D . 
PFX A 0 afano/G . 
PFX A 0 afumo/D . 
PFX A 0 afumo/G . 
PFX A 0 agaro/D . 
PFX A 0 agaro/G . 
PFX A 0 ago/D . 
PFX A 0 ago/G . 
PFX A 0 ahu/D . 
PFX A 0 ahuno/G . 
PFX A 0 ahunoku/F . 
PFX A 0 ahunoku/G . 
PFX A 0 ahunosi/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwa/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwaa/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwachi/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwahu/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwai/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwaiku/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwaisi/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwaka/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakaa/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakachi/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakahu/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakai/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakaka/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakaku/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakamu/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakandi/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakapa/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakari/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakaru/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakati/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakatu/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakau/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakava/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakawa/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwakazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwaku/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwamu/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwandi/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwapa/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwari/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwaru/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwati/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwatu/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwau/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwava/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwawa/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwu/D . 
PFX A 0 ahwuno/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwunoku/F . 
PFX A 0 ahwunoku/G . 
PFX A 0 ahwunosi/G . 
PFX A 0 ai/D . 
PFX A 0 aido/D . 
PFX A 0 aifano/D . 
PFX A 0 aifumo/D . 
PFX A 0 aigaro/D . 
PFX A 0 aigo/D . 
PFX A 0 aiisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 aimbo/D . 
PFX A 0 aindo/D . 
PFX A 0 aingo/D . 
PFX A 0 ainguno/D . 
PFX A 0 aino/D . 
PFX A 0 aino/G . 
PFX A 0 ainoku/F . 
PFX A 0 ainoku/G . 
PFX A 0 ainosi/G . 
PFX A 0 ainyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 ainyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 aisi/D . 
PFX A 0 aisvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 aisviko/D . 
PFX A 0 aisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 aisvo/G . 
PFX A 0 aiswero/D . 
PFX A 0 aito/D . 
PFX A 0 aiwanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 aizai/D . 
PFX A 0 aizo/D . 
PFX A 0 aka/D . 
PFX A 0 aka/G . 
PFX A 0 akaa/D . 
PFX A 0 akaa/G . 
PFX A 0 akachi/D . 
PFX A 0 akachi/G . 
PFX A 0/N akado/D . 
PFX A 0 akado/D . 
PFX A 0 akado/G . 
PFX A 0 akadzi/D . 
PFX A 0 akadzi/G . 
PFX A 0/N akafano/D . 
PFX A 0 akafano/D . 
PFX A 0 akafano/G . 
PFX A 0/N akafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 akafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 akafumo/G . 
PFX A 0/N akagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 akagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 akagaro/G . 
PFX A 0/N akago/D . 
PFX A 0 akago/D . 
PFX A 0 akago/G . 
PFX A 0 akahu/D . 
PFX A 0 akahu/G . 
PFX A 0 akahwu/D . 
PFX A 0 akahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 akai/D . 
PFX A 0 akai/G . 
PFX A 0 akaiku/G . 
PFX A 0 akaisi/G . 
PFX A 0/N akaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 akaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 akaisvo/G . 
PFX A 0 akaka/D . 
PFX A 0 akaka/G . 
PFX A 0 akakaa/G . 
PFX A 0 akakachi/G . 
PFX A 0 akakadzi/G . 
PFX A 0 akakahu/G . 
PFX A 0 akakahwu/G . 
PFX A 0 akakai/G . 
PFX A 0 akakaka/G . 
PFX A 0 akakaku/G . 
PFX A 0 akakamu/G . 
PFX A 0 akakandi/G . 
PFX A 0 akakapa/G . 
PFX A 0 akakari/G . 
PFX A 0 akakaru/G . 
PFX A 0 akakarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 akakati/G . 
PFX A 0 akakatu/G . 
PFX A 0 akakatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 akakau/G . 
PFX A 0 akakava/G . 
PFX A 0 akakawa/G . 
PFX A 0 akakazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 akaku/D . 
PFX A 0 akaku/G . 
PFX A 0/N akambo/D . 
PFX A 0 akambo/D . 
PFX A 0 akambo/G . 
PFX A 0 akamu/D . 
PFX A 0 akamu/G . 
PFX A 0 akandi/D . 
PFX A 0 akandi/G . 
PFX A 0/N akando/D . 
PFX A 0 akando/D . 
PFX A 0 akando/G . 
PFX A 0/N akango/D . 
PFX A 0 akango/D . 
PFX A 0 akango/G . 
PFX A 0/N akanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 akanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 akanguno/G . 
PFX A 0/N akano/D . 
PFX A 0 akano/D . 
