sn_ZW/sn_ZW.dic
anikira/AVQ
babanga/AVQ
bandana/AVQ
bapaira/AVQ
batira/AVQ
baura/AVQ
benhura/AVQ
betseredza/AVQ
bhadharirwa/AVQ
bhamaradza/AVQ
bhebheuka/AVQ
bhendenura/AVQ
bhigidhika/AVQ
bhoira/AVQ
bhubhudyuka/AVQ
bhunya/AVQ
bhuyisa/AVQ
bidza/AVQ
bingisa/AVQ
biridzira/AVQ
biyinga/AVQ
bokorera/AVQ
bonga/AVQ
bopa/AVQ
bozha/AVQ
budirwa/AVQ
buma/AVQ
bunga/AVQ
burikira/AVQ
buura/AVQ
bvandanudza/AVQ
bvarapfadza/AVQ
bvengenya/AVQ
bviripfinda/AVQ
bvojomoka/AVQ
bvoora/AVQ
bvubvumara/AVQ
bvukira/AVQ
bvumbukira/AVQ
bvunduka/AVQ
bvunzira/AVQ
bvuruvadza/AVQ
bwadagudza/AVQ
bwataira/AVQ
bweka/AVQ
bwibwidza/AVQ
bwiridzira/AVQ
bwu/AVQ
chachanha/AVQ
chadha/AVQ
chanjaidza/AVQ
chaya/AVQ
cheja/AVQ
cheneswa/AVQ
chepfudza/AVQ
chichidzira/AVQ
china/AVQ
chinjika/AVQ
chochonya/AVQ
chukucha/AVQ
dadizika/AVQ
dandaura/AVQ
dededza/AVQ
demwezeka/AVQ
detemba/AVQ
dhakwa/AVQ
dhibhisa/AVQ
dhirowa/AVQ
dhudhudzira/AVQ
dididza/AVQ
dinhuka/AVQ
donaidza/AVQ
doya/AVQ
dundumara/AVQ
dyana/AVQ
dzadzarisana/AVQ
dzatutsa/AVQ
dziira/AVQ
dzimira/AVQ
dziuka/AVQ
dzomotoka/AVQ
dzungaira/AVQ
dzvarira/AVQ
dzvovesa/AVQ
emesa/AVQ
erera/AVQ
fakanyika/AVQ
farandandika/AVQ
fedha/AVQ
femerwa/AVQ
ferenuka/AVQ
finduka/AVQ
fobha/AVQ
fonokora/AVQ
fovovodza/AVQ
fufuruka/AVQ
fukunura/AVQ
fundika/AVQ
funhidza/AVQ
fureza/AVQ
fusuka/AVQ
gabhaira/AVQ
gagadidza/AVQ
gangarika/AVQ
gashirika/AVQ
girajuweta/AVQ
goka/AVQ
gonja/AVQ
gudhudza/AVQ
gumanisa/AVQ
gundumuka/AVQ
gurupidza/AVQ
gwacharika/AVQ
gwanzura/AVQ
gwedya/AVQ
gwinyura/AVQ
hetsira/AVQ
hurududika/AVQ
hwerengedza/AVQ
indidzana/AVQ
jacha/AVQ
jaura/AVQ
joboka/AVQ
kabuka/AVQ
kakanyara/AVQ
kamhina/AVQ
kanganisa/AVQ
kanzera/AVQ
karudza/AVQ
kaura/AVQ
kerekedza/AVQ
kochanidza/AVQ
kohwa/AVQ
komboni/AVQ
konona/AVQ
korokodza/AVQ
kotana/AVQ
kubvura/AVQ
kukuza/AVQ
kundika/AVQ
kupuka/AVQ
kusvimidza/AVQ
kuzhumura/AVQ
kwakwanuka/AVQ
kwapura-kwapura/AVQ
kwazhamura/AVQ
kwenura/AVQ
kwicha/AVQ
kwizira/AVQ
manura/AVQ
mbemba/AVQ
mburumbuka/AVQ
mepfurira/AVQ
mhorosa/AVQ
mocha/AVQ
mosa/AVQ
mvenya/AVQ
mwaruka/AVQ
mwisidzana/AVQ
nambuka/AVQ
nanisira/AVQ
ndandamira/AVQ
ndinya/AVQ
ndyundyudza/AVQ
nera/AVQ
ngeda-ngeda/AVQ
ngova/AVQ
ngwacharika/AVQ
nhakura/AVQ
nhuhwirira/AVQ
njaidza/AVQ
njenjekedza/AVQ
nonera/AVQ
nunuzira/AVQ
nyakatika/AVQ
nyangata/AVQ
nyata/AVQ
nyengera/AVQ
nyetura/AVQ
nyn'a/AVQ
nyorovera/AVQ
nyura/AVQ
nzveka-nzveka/AVQ
odha/AVQ
onera/AVQ
pabadudza/AVQ
paka/AVQ
pamha/AVQ
pandutsa/AVQ
papanyara/AVQ
paruka/AVQ
paturora/AVQ
pekesha/AVQ
penza/AVQ
pesa/AVQ
pfachura/AVQ
pfekana/AVQ
pfikura/AVQ
pfokochika/AVQ
pfuhwidza/AVQ
pfumburutsa/AVQ
pfunhudza/AVQ
pfurunuka/AVQ
pidigara/AVQ
pinda-pinda/AVQ
pinyingura/AVQ
pirira/AVQ
pogora/AVQ
popodza/AVQ
poya/AVQ
pumhudza/AVQ
pupfura/AVQ
puruzira/AVQ
pwanya-pwanya/AVQ
pwitira/AVQ
raguka/AVQ
randazuka/AVQ
rasa/AVQ
rayiridza/AVQ
reketa/AVQ
repa/AVQ
riarwa/AVQ
rindimara/AVQ
risha/AVQ
rongonora/AVQ
roverera/AVQ
rukutisa/AVQ
rurikidza/AVQ
saba/AVQ
sakidzira/AVQ
sarenda/AVQ
sededza/AVQ
senerera/AVQ
sevenzera/AVQ
shamisa/AVQ
shapira/AVQ
shazika/AVQ
shingirira/AVQ
shofera/AVQ
shoora/AVQ
shungurudzika/AVQ
shwakata/AVQ
simbirira/AVQ
sisima/AVQ
songorera/AVQ
sukumidza/AVQ
sungira/AVQ
sururidza/AVQ
svapura/AVQ
svesvera/AVQ
svinura/AVQ
svokotora/AVQ
svubura/AVQ
swedera/AVQ
taimira/AVQ
tambaradza/AVQ
tandangura/AVQ
tanhuka/AVQ
tara/AVQ
tashurana/AVQ
taurirwa/AVQ
tegeduka/AVQ
tembera/AVQ
tendeutsa/AVQ
tepfenura/AVQ
tetenuka/AVQ
tibikira/AVQ
timbinurura/AVQ
tipitira/AVQ
todidza/AVQ
tonhera/AVQ
tozomoka/AVQ
tsanhika/AVQ
tsautsa/AVQ
tsera/AVQ
tsikinyidza/AVQ
tsinhisa/AVQ
tsodza/AVQ
tsotsa/AVQ
tsunhuka/AVQ
tsvagurudza/AVQ
tsvedzuka/AVQ
tsvikinyira/AVQ
tsvukirira/AVQ
tudzuka/AVQ
tumburira/AVQ
tunhuka/AVQ
tushura/AVQ
tuza/AVQ
tyora/AVQ
umburudza/AVQ
unidza/AVQ
uunura/AVQ
vandika/AVQ
vaura/AVQ
verengerwa/AVQ
vhanganyuka/AVQ
vheredzera/AVQ
vhiringa/AVQ
vhozhora/AVQ
vhunga/AVQ
vigira/AVQ
vo/AVQ
wamura/AVQ
watsa/AVQ
wo/AVQ
wundindika/AVQ
yaruka/AVQ
yeuchidza/AVQ
zangazika/AVQ
zengeya/AVQ
zhazhira/AVQ
zingaidza/AVQ
zorokana/AVQ
zuzuma/AVQ
zvimbidza/AVQ
zviuraya/AVQ
